lexicon/affixes.lexc
!
! affixes.lexc - Pronominal Suffixes and Agreement Markers
! Contains subject agreement suffixes and pronominal object/possessive suffixes
!

!
! ============================================================
! PERFECT SUFFIXES (attach to qatal, niphal, piel, pual, hiphil, hophal)
! ============================================================

LEXICON SUF-PERF

! 3rd person - no suffix for 3ms/3fs
%.3ms:0      # ;
%.3fs:0      # ;

! 2nd person
%.2ms:Ta     # ;
%.2fs:Ta     # ;

! 1st person
%.1cs:Ti     # ;

! 3rd plural
%.3mp:hem    # ;   ! הֶם
%.3fp:hen    # ;   ! הֶן

! 2nd plural
%.2mp:kem    # ;   ! כֶּם
%.2fp:ken    # ;   ! כֶּן

! 1st plural
%.1cp:nu     # ;   ! נוּ


!
! ============================================================
! IMPERFECT PREFIXES (attach to yiqtol, niphal, piel, hiphil)
! ============================================================

LEXICON PREF-IMPF

! 3rd person
%.3ms:y      # ;    ! י
%.3fs:t      # ;    ! ת (or י with certain verbs)

! 2nd person  
%.2ms:t      # ;    ! ת
%.2fs:t      # ;    ! ת

! 1st person
%.1cs:3      # ;    ! א
%.1cp:n      # ;    ! נ

! 3rd plural
%.3mp:ywu    # ;   ! יְּוּ (with dagesh)
%.3fp:tnh    # ;   ! תְּנָה

! 2nd plural
%.2mp:twu    # ;   ! תְּוּ
%.2fp:tnh    # ;   ! תְּנָה


!
! ============================================================
! IMPERATIVE SUFFIXES
! ============================================================

LEXICON SUF-IMPV

! 2ms - no suffix
%.2ms:0      # ;

! 2fs - ה
%.2fs:h      # ;

! 2mp - וּ
%.2mp:wu    # ;

! 2fp - נָה
%.2fp:nah   # ;


!
! ============================================================
! PRONOMINAL OBJECT SUFFIXES (attach to verbs)
! ============================================================

LEXICON OBJ-SUF

! Direct object markers
%.1cs:ni     # ;    ! נִי
%.2ms:Xa     # ;    ! ךָ  
%.2fs:X      # ;    ! ךְ
%.3ms:o      # ;    ! וֹ  
%.3fs:h      # ;    ! ָהּ
%.1cp:nu     # ;    ! נוּ

%.2mp:kem    # ;    ! כֶּם
%.2fp:ken    # ;    ! כֶּן  
%.3mp:hem    # ;    ! הֶם
%.3fp:hen    # ;    ! הֶן


!
! ============================================================
! POSSESSIVE SUFFIXES (attach to nouns)
! ============================================================

LEXICON POS-SUF

! Singular possessor
%.1cs:i      # ;    ! ִי
%.2ms:Xa     # ;    ! ךָ
%.2fs:X      # ;    ! ךְ
%.3ms:o      # ;    ! וֹ / הוּ
%.3fs:h      # ;    ! הָ / ָהּ

! Plural possessor
%.1cp:nu     # ;    ! נוּ
%.2mp:kem    # ;    ! כֶּם
%.2fp:ken    # ;    ! כֶּן
%.3mp:hem    # ;    ! הֶם
%.3fp:hen    # ;    ! הֶן


!
! ============================================================
! PROCLITIC PARTICLES
! ============================================================

LEXICON PROCLITIC

! Definite article ה
%<art%>:h     # ;

! Conjunction ו
%<conj%>:w     # ;
%<conj%>:wu    # ;    ! וּ with dagesh  

! Preposition ב
%<b%>:b      # ;
%<b-art%>:b    # ;    ! ב + article

! Preposition כ
%<k%>:k       # ;
%<k-art%>:k    # ;    ! כ + article

! Preposition ל
%<l%>:l       # ;
%<l-art%>:l    # ;    ! ל + article

! Preposition מ (מן)
%<m%>:m       # ;


!
! ============================================================
! DAGESH AND VOWEL MARKERS (phonological)
! ============================================================

LEXICON DAGESH

! Dagesh lene - in בגדכפט after vowel
%<dageshlene%>:  # ;

! Dagesh forte - gemination marker
%<dageshforte%>: # ;


!
! ============================================================
! VOWEL QUANTITY MARKERS
! ============================================================

LEXICON VOWEL

! Short vowels
%<patach%>:a   # ;
%<segol%>:e    # ;
%<hiriq%>:i   # ;
%<holam%>:o    # ;
%<shwa%>:0     # ;

! Long vowels
%<tsere%>:e:   # ;
%<sere%>:e:    # ;
%<holem%>:o:   # ;
%<qamets%>:a:   # ;


!
! ============================================================
! PARTIALS FOR COMPOUND FORMS
! ============================================================

! ============================================================
! Participle plural markers
! ============================================================

LEXICON PLNUM

%<mp%>:im     # ;
%<fp%>:ot     # ;


! ============================================================
! Dual markers (nouns)
! ============================================================

LEXICON DUAL

%.sd:ayim     # ;
%.fd:ayim     # ;


! ============================================================
! Plural markers (nouns)
! ============================================================

LEXICON PL

%.mp:im      # ;
%.fp:ot      # ;


! ============================================================
! Feminine markers
! ============================================================

LEXICON FEM

%.fs:t       # ;
%.fp:t       # ;
